District of Columbia statutes.
26-551.14

Notification of other government agencies.

(a)

If the Commissioner finds in the Commissioner’s final order that a violation of the District of Columbia Banking Code has occurred or is occurring, the Commissioner shall refer the matter to the Corporation Counsel or to the United States Attorney for appropriate action.

(b)

If the Commissioner determines that a national bank, federally chartered savings and loan, federally chartered savings bank, or federally chartered credit union has acted in violation of the laws of the District or has engaged in an unsafe or unsound conduct, the Commission shall notify the appropriate federal financial institutions agency and the United States Attorney General.

June 9, 2001, D.C. Law 13-308, § 114, 48 DCR 3244

History